California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(b) If energization time periods exceed the commission’s target averages or if an electrical corporation has a substantial number of energization projects that exceed the commission’s target maximums, the electrical corporation shall include in its annual report a strategy for meeting the targets in the future. The commission may request modification of the electrical corporation’s strategy to ensure the electrical corporation meets targets promptly and consistent with the policies set forth in Section 933.

(c) Each electrical corporation shall report anonymized or averaged data to the extent necessary to prevent identifying individual customers. The
 commission shall require all reports to be publicly available.

(d) The commission shall require
 an
 electrical corporation to take remedial actions necessary to achieve the targets established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(e) The commission shall periodically update the energization time periods established in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and the electrical corporation’s annual reporting requirements to reflect changed circumstances, new information, and experience.

(f) The commission shall evaluate and report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on or before January 1, 2027, whether to require an electrical corporation to have an executive incentive compensation structure that includes incentive compensation based on meeting the targets adopted in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) for all executive officers.

(g) On or before January 1, 2027, the commission shall establish an enforcement policy for the targets adopted in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) that include penalties for not complying with the remedial actions required pursuant to subdivision (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 36.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

935.

(a) As part of each annual report, including any updates pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 934, and in each general rate case application, each electrical corporation shall include a detailed analysis of its current qualified staffing level and future required qualified staffing level for each job classification needed to be consistent with the findings and achieve the policies and requirements of this article.

(b) The commission shall require each electrical corporation to have adequate qualified staffing needed to be consistent with the findings and achieve the policies and requirements of this article.

(c) For job classifications that have apprentice training requirements,
 the commission shall require each electrical corporation to maintain a pipeline of apprentices sufficient to meet future qualified staffing needs, subject to any limitations based on safe staffing ratios.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 394, Sec. 1.   (SB 410)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

936.

(a) In addition to the requirements of Section 740.21, the commission shall require an electrical corporation to do both of the following:

(1) Consider, in its annual distribution planning process, all of the following:

(A) Federal, state, regional, and local air quality and decarbonization standards, plans, and regulations.

(B) The transportation and building electrification policies of state law.

(C) State agency, local agency, and local government plans and requirements related to housing, economic development, critical facilities, transportation, and
 building electrification.

(D) Known load, and projections of load provided by the Energy Commission.

(E) Projections of load that exceed forecasts provided by the Energy Commission.

(2) Adopt and implement plans to satisfy the policies set forth in Section 933, to support achieving the requirements listed in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of paragraph (1), and to meet the energization time periods established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 934, including any updates pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 934.

(b) For purposes of subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), an electrical corporation may only use a projection of load that exceeds forecasts provided by the Energy Commission if the electrical
 corporation provides to the commission detailed information on how the forecasts are developed and what state or local policies or customer requests necessitated the alternative forecast.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 394, Sec. 1.   (SB 410)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

937.

(a) The commission shall ensure that each electrical corporation has sufficient and timely recovery of costs to be consistent with the findings and achieve the policies and requirements of this article, including for energization projects.

(b) If requested by the electrical corporation, the commission shall authorize, within 180 days of the request, the use of a ratemaking mechanism that does all of the following:

(1) Authorizes the electrical corporation to track costs for energization projects placed in service after January 1, 2024, that exceed the costs included in the electrical corporation’s annual authorized revenue requirement for energization, as established in the
 electrical corporation’s general rate case or any other proceeding.

(2) Requires the commission to establish an up-front annual cap on the amount that each electrical corporation can recover within the mechanism. Before establishing the cap, the commission shall review all information submitted by the electrical corporation pursuant to subdivision (c).

(3) Requires the commission to authorize the recovery of costs tracked within the mechanism through an annual rate adjustment until it determines whether the costs are just and reasonable in the electrical corporation’s next general rate case. The commission shall require the electrical corporation to include in its next general rate case application a demonstration that the costs incurred were just and reasonable. Any costs that the commission finds were not just and reasonable shall be subject to refund.

(4) Requires only costs associated with energization to be included in the mechanism and requires costs to be tracked using the same cost categories as used by the electrical corporation in its general rate case application.

(5) Prevents the electrical corporation from recovering any costs through the mechanism in any year until its recorded spending for energization projects exceeds its annualized revenue requirements for energization projects as established in the electrical corporation’s general rate case.

(c) An electrical corporation, as part of its request for a ratemaking mechanism pursuant to subdivision (b), shall include in its request all of the following:

(1) A detailed summary of energization costs authorized in its current general rate case
 or any other proceeding.

(2) Requested energization costs in its pending general rate case, if it has a pending case.

(3) Costs authorized for other purposes in its current general rate case or any other proceeding but used for energization.

(4) The number of anticipated energization projects per year that are expected to be started or completed.

(5) If the electrical corporation is an operator, as defined in Section 25548.1 of the Public Resources Code, the amount of the compensation identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (s) of Section 712.8 that it has forecasted it will spend on energization.

(d) The commission shall ensure that each electrical corporation improves upon
 energization planning, consistent with the requirements of Section 936, when requesting an authorized revenue requirement during the electrical corporation’s general rate case, in order to minimize the need for any ratemaking mechanism authorized pursuant to this section.

(e) This section shall be repealed on January 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 394, Sec. 1.   (SB 410)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

938.

(a) The commission shall require an electrical corporation that requests the use of a ratemaking mechanism, pursuant to Section 937, as a condition of authorizing the use of the mechanism, to satisfy all of the following requirements:

(1) The electrical corporation shall agree to retain an independent third-party auditor, which shall be selected by the commission based on nonbinding recommendations from the electrical corporation, to review the electrical corporation’s business practices and procedures for energizing new customers and how the electrical corporation is planning for demand growth, including new customer energizations.

(2) The electrical corporation shall not recover
 the costs of the third-party auditor from ratepayers.

(3) The third-party auditor shall review all of the following:

(A) The electrical corporation’s customer energization requests for the previous three years.

(B) The electrical corporation’s projections of customer demand growth included in the electrical corporation’s distribution plan, including growth in new customers and growth in demand from existing customers.

(C) The electrical corporation’s qualified staffing levels and future anticipated staffing needs to meet projections for customer demand growth, including the ability of the electrical corporation to sufficiently build its workforce.

(D) Funding requested by the electrical
 corporation to support energization requests for the previous three years in the general rate case or any other proceeding, and the efficacy of those previous requests in meeting customer demand.

(E) Commission authorized funding for the electrical corporation to support energization for the previous three years, future authorized funding, and authorized changes to the electrical corporation’s business practices or structures to improve its ability to respond to changing customer demand.

(F) The electrical corporation’s performance in meeting energization time periods established by the commission pursuant to this article.

(G) The electrical corporation’s performance in meeting its internally established energization time periods over the prior 10 years or longer, as necessary.

(H) Any other metrics deemed relevant by the commission or third-party auditor to support a thorough evaluation of the electrical corporation’s energization performance, including to identify and correct past flaws and to identify future best practices.

(4) The third-party auditor shall evaluate the electrical corporation’s current and future energization performance and make recommendations as to whether the electrical corporation is adequately meeting and anticipating customer demand, adequately training and retaining an adequate workforce, and is funded at sufficient levels to meet forecasted demand growth.

(5) The third-party auditor shall report to the commission on a biannual basis. The reports of the auditor shall be posted on the commission’s internet website and reported to the appropriate policy committees of
 the Legislature.

(b) The electrical corporation shall retain an independent third-party auditor as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) before the commission authorizes use of the ratemaking mechanism pursuant to Section 937. The work of the auditor described in paragraphs (3), (4), and (5) of subdivision (a) may occur after the electrical corporation requests authorization for the ratemaking mechanism but shall occur before July 1, 2028. The commission’s 180-day deadline for authorizing the mechanism provided in paragraph (b) of Section 937 shall not be affected by whether the auditor has completed the work described in paragraphs (3), (4), and (5) of subdivision (a).

(c) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2028, and, as of January 1, 2029, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 394, Sec. 1.   (SB 410)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Inoperative July 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

939.

The commission may modify or adjust the requirements of this article for any electrical corporation with fewer than 100,000 service connections, as individual circumstances merit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 394, Sec. 1.   (SB 410)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

939.5.

This article shall not apply to an electrical cooperative, as defined in Section 2776.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 394, Sec. 1.   (SB 410)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

940.

(a) The commission shall require each electrical corporation to retain an independent third-party auditor, which shall be selected by the commission based on nonbinding recommendations from the electrical corporation, to review the electrical corporation’s business practices and procedures for energizing new customers and how the electrical corporation is planning for demand growth, including new customer energizations.

(b) The third-party auditor shall review all of the following:

(1) The electrical corporation’s customer energization requests for the previous three years.

(2) The electrical corporation’s projections of
 customer demand growth included in the electrical corporation’s distribution plan, including growth in new customers and growth in demand from existing customers.

(3) The electrical corporation’s qualified staffing levels and future anticipated staffing needs to meet projections for customer demand growth, including the ability of the electrical corporation to sufficiently build its workforce.

(4) Funding requested by the electrical corporation to support energization requests for the previous three years in the general rate case or any other proceeding, and the efficacy of those previous requests in meeting customer demand.

(5) Commission authorized funding for the electrical corporation to support energization for the previous three years, future authorized funding, and authorized changes to the electrical
 corporation’s business practices or structures to improve its ability to respond to changing customer demand.

(6) The electrical corporation’s performance in meeting the reasonable average and maximum target energization time periods pursuant Section 934.

(7) Any other metrics deemed relevant by the commission or third-party auditor to support a thorough evaluation of the electrical corporation’s energization performance, including to identify and correct past flaws and to identify future best practices.

(c) The third-party auditor shall evaluate the electrical corporation’s current and future energization performance and make recommendations as to whether the electrical corporation is adequately meeting and anticipating customer demand, adequately training and retaining an adequate workforce, and is funded at
 sufficient levels to meet forecasted demand growth.

(d) The third-party auditor shall report to the commission on a biannual basis. The reports of the auditor shall be posted on the commission’s internet website and reported to the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(e) The commission may require an electrical corporation to take remedial actions necessary to address deficiencies identified in the report provided by the third-party auditor pursuant to subdivision (d), or to achieve the targets established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 934.

(f) For purposes of this section, “energization” means connecting customers to the electrical distribution grid and establishing adequate electrical distribution capacity or upgrading electrical distribution or transmission capacity to
 provide electrical service for a new customer, or to provide upgraded electrical service to an existing customer. The determination of adequate electrical distribution capacity includes consideration of future load. “Energization” does not include activities related to connecting electrical supply resources.

(g) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 37.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.5. Gas Pipeline Safety [950. - 978.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [950. - 950.5.]

950.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Commission-regulated gas pipeline facility” means an intrastate gas pipeline facility as defined in Section 60101 of Title 49 of the United States Code, that is subject to the safety regulatory authority of the commission to the extent authorized in the certification submitted by the commission and approved by the United States Secretary of Transportation pursuant to Section 60105 of Title 49 of the United States Code, including each of the following pipelines:

(1) An intrastate distribution line, which is a pipeline that is not subject to the jurisdiction of the Federal Energy
 Regulatory Commission pursuant to Section 717(b) of Title 15 of the United States Code because it is used for the local distribution of natural gas.

(2) An intrastate transmission line, which is a transmission pipeline that the commission, pursuant to Section 717(c) of Title 15 of the United States Code, has certified to the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission as being subject to the regulatory jurisdiction of the commission over rates and service. For these purposes, a transmission pipeline means a pipeline other than a gathering line that: (A) transports gas from a gathering line or storage facility to a distribution center, storage facility, or large volume customer that is not downstream from a distribution center, (B) operates at a hoop stress of 20 percent or more of specified minimum yield strength, or (C) transports gas within a storage field.

(3) An intrastate gathering
 line, which is a pipeline that transports gas from a current production facility to a transmission line or main.

(4) A mobilehome park master-metered natural gas distribution system that is subject to the commission’s safety inspection and enforcement program pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4351) of Division 2.

(5) A propane distribution system that is subject to the commission’s safety inspection and enforcement program pursuant to Chapter 4.1 (commencing with Section 4451) of Division 2.

(b) “Compatible emergency response standards” means emergency response standards that are applicable to intrastate transmission and distribution lines that are in addition to, or more stringent than, the minimum safety standards adopted by the United States Department of Transportation pursuant to Chapter 601
 (commencing with Section 60101) of Subtitle VIII of Title 49 of the United States Code and that the commission is authorized to adopt pursuant to Section 60104(c) of that chapter.

 (c) “High consequence area” has the same meaning as defined in the regulations adopted by the United States Department of Transportation pursuant to Chapter 601 (commencing with Section 60101) of Subtitle VIII of Title 49 of the United States Code (49 C.F.R. 192.903, as adopted January 1, 2011, or a successor regulation).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 520, Sec. 1.   (SB 44)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

950.5.

This chapter shall not apply to gas pipeline facilities owned and operated by a local publicly owned utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 520, Sec. 1.   (SB 44)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 2011 [955. - 972.]

955.

(a) This article shall be known and may be cited as the Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 2011.

(b) The commission is the state authority responsible for regulating and enforcing intrastate gas pipeline transportation and pipeline facilities pursuant to Chapter 601 (commencing with Section 60101) of Subtitle VIII of Title 49 of the United States Code, including the development, submission, and administration of a state pipeline safety program certification for natural gas pipelines pursuant to Section 60105 of that chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 520, Sec. 1.   (SB 44)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

955.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Gas pipeline” means an intrastate distribution line as described in paragraph (1) of, or an intrastate transmission line as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 950.

(2) “Hospital” means a licensed general acute care hospital as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) “School” means a public or private preschool, elementary, or secondary school.

(b) A gas corporation shall provide not less than three working days’ notice to the
 administration of a school or hospital prior to undertaking nonemergency excavation or construction of a gas pipeline, excluding any work that only uses hand tools, pneumatic hand tools, or vacuum technology for the purpose of marking and locating a subsurface installation pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 4216) of Chapter 3.1 of Division 5 of Title 1 of the Government Code, if the work is located within 500 feet of the school or hospital. The notification shall include all of the following:

(1) The name, address, telephone number, and emergency contact information for the gas corporation.

(2) The specific location of the gas pipeline where the excavation or construction will be performed.

(3) The date and time the excavation or construction is to be conducted and when the work is expected to be
 completed.

(4) An invitation and a telephone number to call for further information on what the school or hospital should do in the event of a leak.

(c) The gas corporation shall maintain a record of the date and time of any notification provided to the administration of a school or hospital prior to undertaking nonemergency excavation or construction of a gas pipeline and any subsequent contacts with the administration of a school or hospital relative to the excavation or construction and the actions taken, if any, in response to those subsequent contacts. The gas corporation shall maintain these records and make them available for inspection for no less than five years from the date of the notification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 215.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

956.

(a) On or before July 1, 2012, the commission shall open an appropriate proceeding or expand the scope of an existing proceeding to establish compatible emergency response standards that owners or operators of commission-regulated gas pipeline facilities shall be required to follow for intrastate transmission and distribution lines. The commission shall establish the standards to ensure that intrastate transmission and distribution lines have emergency response plans that adequately prepare them for a natural disaster or malfunction that could cause injury to human life or property, with the purpose of minimizing the occurrence of both.

(b) The commission shall establish the compatible emergency response standards in
 consultation with the California Emergency Management Agency, the State Fire Marshal, and members of California’s first responder community including, but not limited to, members of the California Fire Chiefs Association.

(c) The compatible emergency response standards shall require owners or operators of intrastate transmission and distribution lines to implement emergency response plans that are compatible with the United States Department of Transportation, Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Administration’s regulations concerning emergency plans contained in Section 192.615 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and those plans shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following requirements:

(1) Emergency shutdown and pressure reduction shall be utilized whenever deemed necessary and appropriate by the owners or operators to minimize hazards to life or
 property. An owner or operator shall notify appropriate first responders of emergency shutdown and pressure reduction.

(2) During an emergency response effort, the incident commander may direct coordination between first responders and owners or operators to ensure timely and ongoing communication on decisions for emergency shutdown and pressure reduction.

(3) Owners or operators of intrastate transmission and distribution lines shall establish and maintain liaison with appropriate fire, police, and other public officials to do all of the following:

(A) Learn the responsibility and resources of each government organization that may respond to a gas pipeline emergency, including, but not limited to, the role of the incident commander in an emergency.

(B) Acquaint the officials with the owner’s or operator’s ability in responding to a gas pipeline emergency.

(C) Identify the types of gas pipeline emergencies of which the owner or operator notifies the officials.

(D) Plan how the owner or operator and officials can engage in mutual assistance to minimize hazards to life or property.

(E) Identify and update information on individual personnel responsible for the liaison with the appropriate first responder organizations.

(4) Owners and operators of intrastate transmission lines shall provide the State Fire Marshal and the chief fire official of the applicable city, county, city and county, or fire protection district with instructions on how to access and utilize the National Pipeline
 Mapping System developed by the United States Department of Transportation, Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Administration, utilizing data submitted pursuant to Section 60132 of Title 49 of the United States Code, to improve local response capabilities for pipeline emergencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 842, Sec. 39.   (SB 1222)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

956.5.

Owners and operators of intrastate transmission and distribution lines, at least once each calendar year, shall meet with each local fire department having fire suppression responsibilities in the area where those lines are located to discuss and review contingency plans for emergencies involving the intrastate transmission and distribution lines within the jurisdiction of the local fire department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 519, Sec. 1.   (AB 56)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

957.

(a) (1) Unless the commission determines that it is prohibited from doing so by subdivision (c) of Section 60104 of Title 49 of the United States Code, the commission shall require the installation of automatic shutoff or remote controlled sectionalized block valves on both of the following facilities, if it determines those valves are necessary for the protection of the public:

(A) Intrastate transmission lines that are located in a high consequence area.

(B) Intrastate transmission lines that traverse an active seismic earthquake fault.

(2) Each owner or
 operator of a commission-regulated gas pipeline facility that is an intrastate transmission line shall provide the commission with a valve location plan, along with any recommendations for valve locations. The commission may make modifications to the valve location plan or provide for variations from any location requirements adopted by the commission pursuant to this section that it deems necessary or appropriate and consistent with protection of the public.

(3) The commission shall additionally establish action timelines, adopt standards for how to prioritize installation of automatic shutoff or remote controlled sectionalized block valves pursuant to paragraph (1), ensure that remote and automatic shutoff valves are installed as quickly as is reasonably possible, and establish ongoing procedures for monitoring progress in achieving the requirements of this section.

(b) The
 commission shall authorize recovery in rates for all reasonably incurred costs incurred for implementation of the requirements of this section.

(c) The commission, in consultation with the Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Administration of the United States Department of Transportation, shall adopt and enforce compatible safety standards for commission-regulated gas pipeline facilities that the commission determines should be adopted to implement the requirements of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 521, Sec. 1.   (SB 216)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

958.

(a) Each gas corporation shall prepare and submit to the commission a proposed comprehensive pressure testing implementation plan for all intrastate transmission lines to either pressure test those lines or to replace all segments of intrastate transmission lines that were not pressure tested or that lack sufficient details related to performance of pressure testing. The comprehensive pressure testing implementation plan shall provide for testing or replacing all intrastate transmission lines as soon as practicable. The comprehensive pressure testing implementation plan shall set forth criteria on which pipeline segments were identified for replacement instead of pressure testing.

(b) The comprehensive
 pressure testing implementation plan shall include a timeline for completion that is as soon as practicable, and includes interim safety enhancement measures, including increased patrols and leak surveys, pressure reductions, prioritization of pressure testing for critical pipelines that must run at or near maximum allowable operating pressure values that result in hoop stress levels at or above 30 percent of specified minimum yield stress, and any other measure that the commission determines will enhance public safety during the implementation period. Engineering-based assumptions may be used to determine maximum allowable operating pressure in the absence of complete records, but only as an interim measure until such time as all the lines have been tested or replaced, in order to allow the gas system to continue to operate.

(c) At the completion of the implementation period, all California natural gas intrastate transmission line segments
 shall meet all of the following:

(1) Have been pressure tested.

(2) Have traceable, verifiable, and complete records readily available.

(3) Where warranted, be capable of accommodating in-line inspection devices.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 519, Sec. 3.   (AB 56)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

958.5.

(a) Twice a year, or as determined by the commission, each gas corporation shall file with the division of the commission responsible for utility safety a gas transmission and storage safety report. The division of the commission responsible for utility safety shall review the reports to monitor each gas corporation’s storage and pipeline-related activities to assess whether the projects that have been identified as high risk are being carried out, and to track whether the gas corporation is spending its allocated funds on these storage and pipeline-related safety, reliability, and integrity activities for which they have received approval from the commission.

(b) The gas transmission and storage safety report shall include
 a thorough description and explanation of the strategic planning and decisionmaking approach used to determine and rank the gas storage projects, intrastate transmission line safety, integrity, and reliability, operation and maintenance activities, and inspections of its intrastate transmission lines. If there has been no change in the gas corporation’s approach for determining and ranking which projects and activities are prioritized since the previous gas transmission and storage safety report, the subsequent report may reference the immediately preceding report.

(c) If the division of the commission responsible for utility safety determines that there is a deficiency in a gas corporation’s prioritization or administration of the storage or pipeline capital projects or operation and maintenance activities, the division shall bring the problems to the commission’s immediate attention.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 842, Sec. 40.   (SB 1222)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

959.

Each gas corporation shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the commission, in its general rate case proceeding, that the requested revenue requirements will be sufficient to enable the gas corporation to fund those projects and activities necessary to maintain safe and reliable service and to meet federal and state safety requirements applicable to its gas plant, in a cost-effective manner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 626, Sec. 35.   (SB 901)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

960.

(a) When the federal National Transportation Safety Board (NTSB) submits a safety recommendation letter concerning gas pipeline safety to the commission, the commission shall provide the NTSB with a formal written response to each recommendation not later than 90 days after receiving the letter. The response shall state one of the following:

(1) The commission’s intent to implement the recommendations in full, with a proposed timetable for implementation of the recommendations.

(2) The commission’s intent to implement part of the recommendations, with a proposed timetable for implementation of those recommendations, and detailed reasons for the commission’s
 refusal to implement those recommendations that the commission does not intend to implement.

(3) The commission’s refusal to implement the recommendations, with detailed reasons for the commission’s refusal to implement the recommendations.

(b) If the NTSB issues a safety recommendation letter concerning any commission-regulated gas pipeline facility to the United States Department of Transportation, the federal Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Administration (PHMSA), a gas corporation, or the commission, or the PHMSA issues an advisory bulletin concerning any commission-regulated gas pipeline facility, the commission shall determine if implementation of the recommendation or advisory is appropriate. The basis for the commission’s determination shall be detailed in writing and shall be approved by a majority vote of the commission.

(c) If the commission determines that a safety recommendation made by the NTSB is appropriate or that action concerning an advisory bulletin is necessary, the commission shall issue orders or adopt rules to implement the safety recommendation or advisory as soon as practicable. In implementing the safety recommendation or advisory, the commission shall consider whether a more effective, or equally effective and less costly, alternative exists to address the safety issue that the recommendation or advisory addresses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 56.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

961.

(a) For purposes of this section, “gas corporation workforce” means the employees of a gas corporation and employees of an independent contractor of the gas corporation while working under contract with the gas corporation.

(b) (1) Each gas corporation shall develop a plan for the safe and reliable operation of its commission-regulated gas pipeline facility that implements the policy of paragraph (3) of
 subdivision (b) of Section 963, subject to approval, modification, and adequate funding by the commission.

(2) By December 31, 2012, the commission shall review and accept, modify, or reject the plan for each gas corporation as part of a proceeding that includes a hearing. The commission shall build into any approved plan sufficient flexibility to redirect activities to respond to safety requirements.

(3) Each gas corporation shall implement its approved plan.

(4) The commission shall require each gas corporation to periodically review and update the plan, and the commission shall review and accept, modify, or reject an updated plan at regular intervals thereafter. The commission, pursuant to Section 1701.1, shall determine whether a proceeding on a proposed update to a plan requires a hearing, consistent with
 subdivision (e).

(c) The plan developed, approved, and implemented pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be consistent with best practices in the gas industry and with federal pipeline safety statutes as set forth in Chapter 601 (commencing with Section 60101) of Subtitle VIII of Title 49 of the United States Code and the regulations adopted by
 the United States Department of Transportation pursuant to those statutes.

(d) The plan developed, approved, and implemented pursuant to subdivision (b) shall set forth how the gas corporation will implement the policy established in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 963 and achieve each of the following:

(1) Identify and minimize hazards and systemic risks in order to minimize accidents, explosions, fires, and dangerous conditions, and protect the public and
 the gas corporation workforce.

(2) Identify the safety-related systems that will be deployed to minimize hazards, including adequate documentation of the commission-regulated gas pipeline facility history and capability.

(3) Provide adequate storage and transportation capacity to reliably and safely deliver gas to all customers consistent with rules authorized by the commission governing core and noncore reliability and curtailment, including provisions for expansion, replacement, preventive maintenance, and reactive maintenance and repair of its commission-regulated gas pipeline facility.

(4) Provide for effective patrol and inspection of the commission-regulated gas pipeline facility to detect leaks and other compromised facility conditions and to effect timely repairs.

(5) Provide for appropriate and effective system controls, with respect to both equipment and personnel procedures, to limit the damage from accidents, explosions, fires, and dangerous conditions.

(6) Provide timely response to customer and employee reports of leaks and other hazardous conditions and emergency events, including disconnection, reconnection, and pilot-lighting procedures.

(7) Include appropriate protocols for determining maximum allowable operating pressures on relevant pipeline segments, including all necessary documentation affecting the calculation of maximum allowable operating pressures.

(8) Prepare for, or minimize damage from, and respond to, earthquakes and other major events.

(9) Meet or exceed the minimum standards for safe design, construction, installation, operation, and maintenance of gas transmission and distribution facilities prescribed by regulations issued by the United States Department of Transportation in Part 192 (commencing with Section 192.1) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(10) Ensure an adequately sized, qualified, and properly trained gas corporation workforce to carry out the plan.

(11) Any additional matter that the commission determines should be included in the plan.
